District of Columbia statutes.
42-705

Construction of words importing want or failure of issue.

In any deed or will of real or personal estate in the District of Columbia, executed after March 3, 1901, the words “die without issue,” or the words “die without leaving issue,” or the words “have no issue,” or other words which may import either a want or failure of issue of any person in his lifetime or at the time of his death, or an indefinite failure of his issue, shall be construed to mean a want or failure of issue in the lifetime or at the time of the death of such person, and not an indefinite failure of his issue, unless a contrary intention shall appear in the instrument.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1268, ch. 854, § 504
1981 Ed., § 45-405.
1973 Ed., § 45-205.